Washington statutes.
RCW 38.52.525

State 911 coordination office—Public education materials.

The state 911 coordination office may develop and provide public education materials relating to the 911 emergency communications system.

[ 2022 c 203 s 10; 1995 c 243 s 9.]

NOTES:

Modernization of statewide 911 emergency communications system—2022 c 203: See note following RCW 38.52.010.

Findings—Severability—1995 c 243: See notes following RCW 80.36.555.